Missouri, session 2026, SB1806.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 311, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 311.035, to read as
follows:
311.035. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Political subdivision", any county, city, town,
village, or other unit of local government in this state;
(2) "Small liquor bottle", any original package
lawfully manufactured and distributed under state and
federal law containing fifty milliliters or less of
intoxicating liquor.
2. The regulation of the manufacture, distribution,
sale, offering for sale, and possession for sale of
intoxicating liquor in original packages, including, but not
limited to, small liquor bottles, is a matter of statewide
concern and shall be governed exclusively by state law.
3. No political subdivision shall:
(1) Prohibit the sale, offering for sale,
distribution, or possession for sale of small liquor bottles
by a person or entity duly licensed under this chapter;

SB 1806 2
(2) Enact or enforce any ordinance, order, regulation,
or policy that has the effect of banning or functionally
prohibiting the sale of small liquor bottles that are
otherwise lawful under this chapter; or
(3) Impose any special tax, fee, surcharge, or
container-specific regulation on small liquor bottles that
is not uniformly applied to all other original packages of
intoxicating liquor.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(1) Limit the authority of a political subdivision to
regulate the time, place, and manner of operation of
licensed establishments through generally applicable zoning,
business licensing, or health and safety ordinances;
(2) Limit enforcement of state laws relating to
underage drinking, public intoxication, littering, or other
criminal offenses; or
(3) Authorized the sale of intoxicating liquor by any
person not licensed under this chapter.
5. Any ordinance, regulation, or policy in effect on
or after August 28, 2026, that conflicts with the provisions
of this section is hereby declared void and unenforceable.
6. (1) A person licensed under this chapter who is
adversely affected by a violation of the provisions of this
section may bring a civil action for declaratory and
injunctive relief in a court of competent jurisdiction. The
court shall award reasonable attorney's fees and court costs
to a prevailing plaintiff.
(2) The attorney general may bring an action to
enforce the provisions of this section.
✓